02/span.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
  
%<n%>                ! Noun

LEXICON Root

Noun ;

LEXICON N-eng

%<n%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON N-coche

%<n%>:e SUBST ; 

%<dim_ito%>:%>ito SUBST; !  "diminutivo" 

LEXICON N-gato

%<n%>:o SUBST ;

%<dim_ito%>:%>ito SUBST; !  "diminutivo"

LEXICON N-arroz

%<n%>: SUBST ;

%<dim_ito%>:%>ito SUBST; !  "diminutivo"  

LEXICON SUBST

%<pl_os%>:%>s #; ! "plural"
%<si_o%>:%> #; ! "singular"

LEXICON Noun

club%<n%>:club N-eng ; ! "club"
tuit%<n%>:tuit N-eng ; ! "Tweet"
clic%<n%>:clic N-eng ; ! "click"
taco%<n%>:tac N-gato ; ! "taco"
chico%<n%>:chic N-gato ; ! "boy"
lapiz%<n%>:lapiz N-arroz ; ! "pencil"
arroz%<n%>:arroz N-arroz ; ! "rice"
coche%<n%>:coch N-coche ; ! "car"
hombre%<n%>:hombr N-coche ; ! "man"
gato%<n%>:gat N-gato ; ! "cat"
perro%<n%>:perr N-gato ; ! "dog"
paso%<n%>:pas N-gato ; ! "step"
vaso%<n%>:vas N-gato ; ! "glass"
lobo%<n%>:lob N-gato ; ! "wolf"
hijo%<n%>:hij N-gato ; ! "boy"
puerto%<n%>:puert N-gato ; ! "port"
piso%<n%>:pis N-gato ; ! "floor"
nido%<n%>:nid N-gato ; ! "nest"
libro%<n%>:libr N-gato ; ! "book"
tono%<n%>:ton N-gato ; ! "tone"
mono%<n%>:mon N-gato ; ! "monkey"
vestido%<n%>:vestid N-gato ; ! "dress"
voto%<n%>:vot N-gato ; ! "vote"
viento%<n%>:vient N-gato ; ! "wind"
manzano%<n%>:manzan N-gato ; ! "apple tree"
zapato%<n%>:zapat N-gato ; ! "shoe"
naranjo%<n%>:naranj N-gato ; ! "orange tree"
